Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Mental Illness or Deficiency

Defense of unconsciousness distinguished. —

The defense of unconsciousness resulting from a concussion with no permanent brain damage is an affirmative defense and is a defense separate from the defense of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency. Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981).

Automatism instruction not required where blow to head, coupledwith loss of memory. —

A blow to the head, coupled with a claimed loss of memory, did not require the giving of an instruction on automatism, especially where the defendant to a mayhem charge claimed the biting off of the victim's nose was an accident, and where there was no evidence of a concussion and no evidence that the defendant was devoid of criminal intent. Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Pyromania and the criminal law, 51 ALR4th 1243.

Probation revocation: insanity as defense, 56 ALR4th 1178.

Instructions in state criminal case in which defendant pleads insanity as to hospital confinement in event of acquittal, 81 ALR4th 659.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement, 43 ALR5th 777.

Pathological gambling as basis of defense of insanity in federal criminal case, 76 ALR Fed 749.

§ 7-11-301.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Designated examiner” means a licensed psychiatrist, or other physician with forensic training or a licensed psychologist with forensic training;

“Facility” means the Wyoming state hospital or other facility designated by the court which can adequately provide for the security, examination or treatment of the accused;

“Mental deficiency” means a defect attributable to intellectual disability, brain damage and cognitive disabilities;

“This act” means W.S.

7-11-301

through

7-11-307

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-242.1; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1997, ch. 174, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2009, ch. 31, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming state hospital, see §

25-1-201

.

The 2008 amendment

substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “cognitive” for “learning” in (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Designated examiner.” —

A licensed psychologist was competent to testify regarding the defendant's mental status since he had the required forensic training where he spent his first three and one-half years at the Wyoming State Hospital writing forensic reports, he had written letters to trial courts regarding his mental competency examinations, he had performed psychological testing for forensic psychiatrists and had served as a court-appointed examiner, he had attended four annual workshops in Utah for the purpose of qualifying or certifying forensic examiners, and he had been authorized by the State of Utah to conduct forensic examinations. Shipman v. State, 2001 WY 11, 17 P.3d 34,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2001).

“Brain damage,”

as contemplated in subsection (a)(iii), is some serious and irreversible condition having an impact upon the ability of a person to function. Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981).

“Irresistible-impulse” test not accepted in Wyoming. —

The “irresistible-impulse” test has been accepted in a number of jurisdictions as a standard to determine criminal responsibility. However, it is inconsistent on its face with the standard set forth in the Model Penal Code and in §§

7-11-301

and

7-11-304

.Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Neither is “diminished capacity” defense. —

The mental element necessary for the commission of a crime has now been established by the legislature. If the legislature had intended additional defenses, such as “diminished capacity,” it would have said so. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984); Price v. State, 807 P.2d 909,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979); C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004); Hauck v. State, 2007 WY 113, 162 P.3d 512,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(July 18, 2007); SWM v. State, 2013 WY 49,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Apr 25, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competency to Stand Trial and the Insanity Defense in Wyoming—Some Problems,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1975).

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

§ 7-11-302.
Trial or punishment of person lacking mental capacity.

No person shall be tried, sentenced or punished for the commission of an offense while, as a result of mental illness or deficiency, he lacks the capacity, to:

Comprehend his position;

Understand the nature and object of the proceedings against him;

Conduct his defense in a rational manner; and

Cooperate with his counsel to the end that any available defense may be interposed.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-242.22; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Mental incapacity deemed threshold issue. —

The determination as to whether or not the accused is unfit to proceed due to mental illness or deficiency at the time of trial is a threshold issue which must be resolved to prevent a violation of due process through conviction of a person incompetent to stand trial. Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

“Diminished capacity” not established as defense. —

The mental element necessary for the commission of a crime has now been established by the legislature. If the legislature had intended additional defenses, such as “diminished capacity,” it would have said so. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Refusal to grant continuance upheld. —

In a probation revocation proceeding, the district court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to grant defendant's motion for a continuance while he sought to obtain a competency evaluation pursuant to this section in connection with a misdemeanor charge in county court. Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Competency became an issue during trial. —

A defendant's convictions and sentences for attempted kidnapping in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-201

and

6-1-301

, aggravated assault and battery in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-502

, and aggravated burglary in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

were reversed and the case was remanded for a new trial, where the trial court failed to suspend the proceedings and to conduct a competency hearing, as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-11-303(a), after a psychiatrist's testimony outside the presence of the jury indicated that the defendant was at the very least unable to testify on the defendant's own behalf due to mental problems, thereby raising the question whether the defendant was competent to stand trial, as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-11-302(a).Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003), overruled in part, Snyder v. State, 2021 WY 108, 496 P.3d 1239,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2021).

Incompetency not found. —

Where defendant presented no argument that he was ever incompetent as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-11-302(a), but instead claimed that he suffered from bipolar disorder and was mentally ill and thus was incompetent to knowingly and voluntarily enter his guilty pleas, the supreme court found no abuse of discretion in denying defendant's motion to withdraw his guilty pleas. Koenig v. State, 2005 WY 135, 121 P.3d 780,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 2005).

Circuit court did not abuse its discretion in determining that defendant was competent and fit to proceed to trial because the psychologist acknowledged that, while defendant had a borderline personality disorder which “could undermine a person’s ability to work with their attorney,” she testified he did not show that kind of chaos or anxiety that could contribute in interfering with his ability to work with his defense and thus, she testified it was her opinion that defendant was competent and did not need further treatment. Snyder v. State, 2021 WY 108, 496 P.3d 1239,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2021).

Applied

in

Pote v. State, 695 P.2d 617,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Price v. State, 807 P.2d 909,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1991); Gordon v. State, 2004 WY 105, 97 P.3d 64,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(2004).

Cited

in

Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presumption of continuing insanity as applied to accused in criminal case, 27 ALR2d 121.

Right to counsel in insanity or incompetency adjudication proceedings, 87 ALR2d 950.

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for giving notice of incompetency proceedings which must be given a certain number of days before a known future date, 98 ALR2d 1331.

Burden and sufficiency of proof of mental irresponsibility in criminal case, 17 ALR3d 146.

Mental or emotional condition as diminishing responsibility for crime, 22 ALR3d 1228.

XYY syndrome as affecting criminal responsibility, 42 ALR3d 1414.

Amnesia as affecting capacity to commit crime or to stand trial, 46 ALR3d 544.

Drug addiction or related mental state as defense to criminal charge, 73 ALR3d 16.

Involuntary intoxication as defense to criminal charge, 73 ALR3d 195.

Necessity or propriety of bifurcated criminal trial on issue of insanity defense, 1 ALR4th 884.

Modern status of test of criminal responsibility — state cases, 9 ALR4th 526.

Competency to stand trial of criminal defendant diagnosed as “mentally retarded” — modern cases, 23 ALR4th 493.

Competency to stand trial of criminal defendant diagnosed as “schizophrenic” — modern state cases, 33 ALR4th 1062.

Admissibility and prejudicial effect of evidence, in criminal prosecution, of defendant's involvement with witchcraft, satanism, or the like, 18 ALR5th 804.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement, 43 ALR5th 777.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — conduct occurring at time of trial regarding issues of diminished capacity, intoxication, and unconsciousness, 78 ALR5th 197.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — pretrial conduct or conduct at unspecified time regarding issues of diminished capacity, intoxication, and unconsciousness, 79 ALR5th 419.

Competency to stand trial of criminal defendant diagnosed as “schizophrenic” — modern federal cases, 63 ALR Fed 696.

§ 7-11-303.
Examination of accused to determine fitness to proceed; reports; commitment; defenses and objections.

If it appears at any stage of a criminal proceeding, by motion or upon the court’s own motion, that there is reasonable cause to believe that the accused has a mental illness or deficiency making him unfit to proceed, all further proceedings shall be suspended.

The court shall order an examination of the accused by a designated examiner. The order may include, but is not limited to, an examination of the accused at the Wyoming state hospital on an inpatient or outpatient basis, at a local mental health center on an inpatient or outpatient basis, or at his place of detention. In selecting the examination site, the court may consider proximity to the court, availability of an examiner, and the necessity for security precautions. If the order provides for commitment of the accused to a designated facility, the commitment shall continue no longer than a thirty (30) day period for the study of the mental condition of the accused. The prosecuting attorney and counsel for the accused shall cooperate in providing the relevant information and materials to the designated examiner, and the court may order as necessary that relevant information be provided to the examiner.

Written reports of the examination shall be filed with the clerk of court. The report shall include:

Detailed findings;

An opinion as to whether the accused has a mental illness or deficiency, and its probable duration;

An opinion as to whether the accused, as a result of mental illness or deficiency, lacks capacity to comprehend his position, to understand the nature and object of the proceedings against him, to conduct his defense in a rational manner, and to cooperate with his counsel to the end that any available defense may be interposed;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 31, § 2.

A recommendation as to whether the accused should be held in a designated facility for treatment pending determination by the court of the issue of mental fitness to proceed; and

A recommendation as to whether the accused, if found by the court to be mentally fit to proceed, should be detained in a designated facility pending further proceedings.

The clerk of court shall deliver copies of the report to the district attorney and to the accused or his counsel. The report is not a public record or open to the public. After receiving a copy of the report, both the accused and the state may, upon written request and for good cause shown, obtain an order granting them an examination of the accused by a designated examiner of their own choosing. For each examination ordered, a report conforming to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section shall be furnished to the court and the opposing party.

If the initial report contains the recommendation that the accused should be held in a designated facility pending determination of the issue of mental fitness to proceed, the court may order that the accused be committed to or held in a designated facility pending determination of mental fitness to proceed. The court may order the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medications to a person accused of a serious crime as defined in W.S. 7-6-102(a)(v) to render the accused competent to stand trial, provided the court finds:

There are important governmental interests at stake including, but not limited to:

Bringing the accused to trial;

Timely prosecution;

Assuring the accused has a fair trial.

The involuntary administration of antipsychotic medications will significantly further the governmental interest and the administration of the medication is:

Substantially likely to render the accused competent to stand trial; and

Substantially unlikely to have side effects that will interfere significantly with the ability of the accused to assist counsel in conducting a trial defense, thereby rendering the trial unfair.

That any alternative and less intrusive treatments are unlikely to achieve substantially the same results; and

The administration pursuant to a prescription by a licensed psychiatrist of the antipsychotic medications is medically appropriate and is in the best medical interests of the accused in light of the accused’s medical condition.

If neither the state, nor the accused or his counsel contests the opinion referred to in paragraph (c)(iii) of this section relative to fitness to proceed, the court may make a determination and finding of record on this issue on the basis of the report filed or the court may hold a hearing on its own motion. If the opinion relative to fitness to proceed is contested the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. The report or reports may be received in evidence at any hearing on the issue. The party contesting any opinion relative to fitness to proceed has the right to summon and cross-examine the persons who rendered the opinion and to offer evidence upon the issue.

If the court determines that the accused is mentally fit to proceed, the court may order that the accused be held in confinement, be committed to a designated facility pending further proceedings, or be released on bail or other conditions. If the court determines that the accused lacks mental fitness to proceed, the proceedings against him shall be suspended and the court shall commit him to a designated facility to determine whether there is substantial probability that the accused will regain his fitness to proceed:

The examiner shall provide a full report to the court, the prosecuting attorney and the accused or his counsel within ninety (90) days of arrival of the accused at the designated treating facility. If the examiner is unable to complete the assessment within ninety (90) days the examiner shall provide to the court and counsel a summary progress report which informs the court that additional time is necessary to complete the assessment, in which case the examiner may have up to an additional ninety (90) days to provide the full report for good cause shown, as follows:

The full report shall assess:

The facility’s or program’s capacity to provide appropriate treatment for the accused;

The nature of treatments provided to the accused;

What progress toward competency restoration has been made with respect to the factors identified by the court in its initial order;

The accused’s current level of mental disorder or mental deficiency and need for treatment, if any; and

The likelihood of restoration of competency and the amount of time estimated to achieve competency.

Upon receipt of the full report, the court shall hold a hearing to determine the accused’s current status. The burden of proving that the accused is fit to proceed shall be on the proponent of the assertion. Following the hearing, the court shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence whether the accused is:

Fit to proceed;

Not fit to proceed with a substantial probability that the accused may become fit to proceed in the foreseeable future; or

Not fit to proceed without a substantial probability that the accused may become fit to proceed in the foreseeable future.

If the court makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (B)(I) of this paragraph, the court shall proceed with the trial or any other procedures as may be necessary to adjudicate the charges;

If the court makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (B)(II) of this paragraph, the court may order that the accused remain committed to the custody of the designated facility for the purpose of treatment intended to restore the accused to competency;

If the court makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (B)(III) of this paragraph, the court shall order the accused released from the custody of the designated facility unless proper civil commitment proceedings have been instituted and held as provided in title 25 of the Wyoming statutes. The continued retention, hospitalization and discharge of the accused shall be the same as for other patients.

If it is determined pursuant to subdivision (i)(B)(II) of this subsection that there is substantial probability that the accused will regain his fitness to proceed, the commitment of the accused at a designated facility shall continue until the head of the facility reports to the court that in his opinion the accused is fit to proceed. If this opinion is not contested by the state, the accused or his counsel, the criminal proceeding shall be resumed. If the opinion is contested, the court shall hold a hearing as provided in subsection (f) of this section. While the accused remains at a designated facility under this subsection, the head of the facility shall issue a full report at least once every three (3) months in accordance with the requirements of subparagraph (i)(A) of this subsection on the progress the accused is making towards regaining his fitness to proceed.

A finding by the court that the accused is mentally fit to proceed shall not prejudice the accused in a defense to the crime charged on the ground that at the time of the act he was afflicted with a mental illness or deficiency excluding responsibility. Nor shall the finding be introduced in evidence on that issue or otherwise brought to the notice of the jury. No statement made by the accused in the course of any examination or treatment pursuant to this section and no information received by any person in the course of the examination or treatment shall be admitted in evidence in any criminal proceeding then or thereafter pending on any issue other than that of the mental condition of the accused.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, counsel for the accused may make any and all legal objections which are susceptible of a fair determination prior to trial without the personal participation of the accused.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-252.3; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2006, ch. 24, § 1; 2009, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to bail, see chapter 10 of this title.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added “If requested by the court an,” in (c)(iv).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 31, §§ 1 and 2, effective July 1, 2009, deleted “pretrial” after “reports of the” in the introductory language of (c); and repealed former (c)(iv) which read: “If requested by the court, an opinion as to whether at the time of the alleged criminal conduct the accused, as a result of mental illness or deficiency, lacked substantial capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law.”

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (e) to provide standards for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medications to a mentally ill person accused of a serious crime, and requiring findings.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the last sentence in (b); in the introductory language of (g), deleted “for such period as the court may order but not to exceed the time reasonably necessary” following “commit him to a designated facility”; substituted the present (g)(i) for former (g)(i), which read: “If it is determined that there is no substantial probability that the accused will regain his fitness to proceed, the accused shall not be retained in a designated facility unless proper civil commitment proceedings have been instituted and held as provided in title 25 of the Wyoming statutes. The continued retention, hospitalization and discharge of the accused shall be the same as for other patients. However, if the accused is discharged, the criminal proceedings shall be resumed, unless the court determines that so much time has elapsed since the commitment of the accused that it would not be appropriate to resume the criminal proceeding”; and in (g)(ii), inserted “pursuant to subdivision (i)(B)(II) of this subsection” near the beginning, and deleted “as provided in paragraph (iii) of subsection (c) of this section” at the end of the first sentence, and inserted “issue a full” and “in accordance with the requirements of subparagraph (i)(A) of this subsection” in the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conviction issued prior to request for competency evaluation. —

Defendant was properly convicted of interference with a peace officer because his conviction was issued prior to his request for a second competency evaluation; therefore, the trial court did not err in failing to suspend proceedings and order a second competency evaluation. Marshall v. State, 2016 WY 119, 385 P.3d 304,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2016).

No error in failing to suspend proceedings for competency evaluation. —

Because defendant did not challenged the trial court's finding that he was competent to enter his Alford plea, any alleged error in the failure to suspend proceedings for a competency evaluation was ultimately inconsequential; defendant's motion to suspend the proceeding did not, by itself, compel the district court to suspend proceedings for a competency evaluation. Marshall v. State, 2016 WY 119, 385 P.3d 304,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2016).

Because there was no new information presented that would give reasonable cause to believe that defendant had a mental illness or deficiency making him unfit to proceed, substantial evidence supported the district court's determination that further inquiry into defendant's competency was not warranted. Marshall v. State, 2016 WY 119, 385 P.3d 304,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2016).

Trial court did not err by failing to hold a third competency hearing due to the head injury defendant sustained immediately prior to the sentencing hearing because there was no evidence the head injury gave the trial court reasonable cause to believe that he had developed a mental illness or deficiency, as defense counsel told the trial court that defendant had been checked out by emergency services and he wished to proceed with sentencing, and defendant’s one-word answers were consistent with his answers at the change of plea hearing. Merlak v. State, 2021 WY 95, 493 P.3d 187,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2021).

Application to probation revocation proceedings. —

Court properly ordered the involuntary administration of medication to defendant for the probation revocation hearing because the plain language of this section granted a court the authority to order involuntary administration of medication in order to restore a defendant to competency for probation revocation proceedings. DeMillard v. State, 2013 WY 99, 308 P.3d 825,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2013).

Mental incapacity deemed threshold issue. —

The determination as to whether or not the accused is unfit to proceed due to mental illness or deficiency at the time of trial is a threshold issue, which must be resolved to prevent a violation of due process through conviction of a person incompetent to stand trial. Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

State hospital letter did not comply with the requirements of subsection (c),

where it included no comment as to defendant's condition at the time of the alleged criminal conduct, referenced no conclusion in regard to cooperation with his counsel, and failed to suggest what other examination or observation might provide some realistic evidence. Engle v. State, 774 P.2d 1303,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1989).

Failure to give report to defendant. —

The failure of the defendant to receive a copy of a written report as to results of examination of the defendant at the state hospital did not constitute reversible error where the defendant made no demand to see the report, did not request a continuance so as to examine report and had the benefit obtained from cross-examination of doctors who testified for the state. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1956), rehearing denied, 76 Wyo. 63, 300 P.2d 567 (1956), cert. denied, 352 U.S. 981, 77 S. Ct. 384, 1 L. Ed. 2d 366, 1957 U.S. LEXIS 1443 (1957) (decided under prior law).

Furnishing of examination reports to codefendant. —

The trial court did not err in denying the defendant access to a codefendant's psychiatric evaluation. Vena v. State, 941 P.2d 33,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Furnishing of examination reports to jury. —

There is no requirement in §

7-11-305

for the furnishing to a jury of a report of the result of the examinations conducted by the various experts, as to the defendant's competency, except insofar as testimony may be presented under the provisions of this section and §

7-11-304

.Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

Defendant may withdraw guilty plea upon documenting mental illness or deficiency defense. —

A presentation by the defendant in connection with his motion for leave to withdraw his plea of guilty, of supporting documentation for the proposition that he has developed reliable evidence sustaining the defense of mental illness or deficiency presents a “plausible reason” and a “fair and just” reason for withdrawing the plea. Schmidt v. State, 668 P.2d 656,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1983).

Former provision limiting commitment of defendant to state hospital to a certain period

was purely directory. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

No appointment deadline for expert witnesses. —

There is no requirement in §

7-11-305

for appointment or approval of intended expert witnesses within five days of receipt of the report required by this section. Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

Burden of proof on party contesting opinion. —

In a subsection (f) hearing arising from a contested opinion on competency, the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence rests on the party seeking to establish that the accused is competent. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Placing burden of proving competency with accused was harmless error,

where the trial court specifically found the evidence such that it would have held the accused competent to stand trial regardless of the allocation of the burden of proof. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Standards for juvenile proceedings. —

Finding that
petitioner, a juvenile, was competent to proceeding to adjudication
in a delinquency proceeding was improper because, although the juvenile
court ordered a competency evaluation and ruled that petitioner was
competent to proceed, it did not evaluate him under the correct standards
set out in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-11-302

and

7-11-303

. The psychologist offered the opinion that he appeared
to be less familiar with general legal terms and concepts than the
average adult defendant, but because he was 12 at the time, the juvenile
should not have been compared to the average adult defendant, but
to an average child of the same age.
SWM v. State, 2013 WY 49, 299 P.3d 673,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2013).

Additional evidence accepted at hearing. —

At the hearing conducted under §

7-11-305

, the contesting party may offer evidence in addition to that of the designated examiners. Hayes v. State, 599 P.2d 558,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1979).

Evidence bearing on defendant's knowledge not too remote for jury's consideration. —

Evidence which may have a bearing on the questions of whether the defendant understood the nature or quality of his act where defendant is charged with murder in the first degree and whether he knew right from wrong will not be deemed too remote for the jury's consideration. Gerard v. State, 511 P.2d 99,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 1072, 94 S. Ct. 585, 38 L. Ed. 2d 478, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1655 (U.S. 1973).

Disposal after guilt determination may not be injected into criminal trial. —

It would be improper to inject into the trial of a criminal case the issue of defendant's disposal after his guilt or innocence has been determined. Lonquest v. State, 495 P.2d 575,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 409 U.S. 1006, 93 S. Ct. 432, 34 L. Ed. 2d 299, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 639 (U.S. 1972).

Defendant not incompetent. —

See Pote v. State, 695 P.2d 617,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1985).

Defendant underwent a mental evaluation which concluded he was competent, and he did not contest the results of the evaluation or request an additional evaluation; after the evaluation was completed, there was no new evidence suggesting defendant's capacity had diminished. Thus, the district court complied with the mental examination requirements set out in the statutes, and defendant's due process rights were not violated. Follett v. State, 2006 WY 47, 132 P.3d 1155,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2006), reh'g denied,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. May 3, 2006).

Consent to use of reports constituted waiver. —

District court's use of two psychological reports for purposes of sentencing did not violate this section; because the court clearly informed the defendant that it would consider these reports and the defendant consented to the use of the reports in sentencing, he waived objection to their consideration by the court. Ochoa v. State, 848 P.2d 1359,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1993).

Defendant entitled to credit for pre-sentence confinement. —

If a defendant is maintained in custody for purposes of evaluating mental competency or treating mental illness, he is entitled to credit for that period of incarceration, and it makes no difference whether he was maintained in pre-sentence confinement for purposes of the mental examination or because he could not post bond. Lightly v. State, 739 P.2d 1232,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 475

(Wyo. 1987).

Competency became an issue during trial. —

A defendant's convictions and sentences for attempted kidnapping in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-201

and

6-1-301

, aggravated assault and battery in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-502

, and aggravated burglary in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

were reversed and the case was remanded for a new trial, where the trial court failed to suspend the proceedings and conduct a competency hearing, as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-11-303(a), after a psychiatrist's testimony outside the presence of the jury indicated that the defendant was at the very least unable to testify on the defendant's own behalf due to mental problems, thereby raising the question whether the defendant was competent to stand trial, as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-11-302(a).Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003), overruled in part, Snyder v. State, 2021 WY 108, 496 P.3d 1239,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2021).

Successive competency motions. —

Because there was no new information presented that would give reasonable cause to believe that the accused had a mental illness or deficiency making him unfit to proceed, the trial court did not err when it determined further inquiry into defendant's competency was not warranted and in denying defendant's second motion to determine defendant's competency.
Schaeffer v. State, 2012 WY 9, 268 P.3d 1045,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2012).

Matter not closed. —

Record clearly reflected, contrary to defendant's assertion, that district court compared statements contained in the risk assessment with earlier testimony presented on competency issue and found that no new evidence was presented; defendant's argument that district court did not fulfill its obligation and ruled the matter of competency “closed” was not supported by the record.
Haynes v. State, 2008 WY 75, 186 P.3d 1204,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2008).

Defendant's right to speedy trial. —

Defendant's right to a speedy trial was not violated because, calculating the days from October 21, 2004, the date defendant first raised the issue of his mental illness, to June 7, 2005, the date the district court finally resolved the issue once and for all, 230 days elapsed. Of the total 337 days of delay, those 230 were excludable under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 48, thus resulting in a remainder of 107 days; that 107 being well under the 180-day limit of Rule 48.
Potter v. State, 2007 WY 83, 158 P.3d 656,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Dougherty v. Merrill, 602 P.2d 377,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1979).

Quoted

in

Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984); Stone v. State, 745 P.2d 1344,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 547

(Wyo. 1987); McGinn v. State, 928 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1996); Hannon v. State, 2004 WY 8, 84 P.3d 320,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(2004).

Stated

in

Smith v. State, 871 P.2d 186,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Herdt v. State, 891 P.2d 793,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1995);
C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004);Osborne v. State, 2012 WY 123,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Sept 13, 2012); McEwan v. State, 2013 WY 158, 314 P.3d 1160,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 164

, 2013 WL 6818011 (Dec 23, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Insanity, Bifurcation and Due Process: Can Values Survive Doctrine,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 515 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutes providing for psychiatric examination of accused to determine mental condition, 32 ALR2d 434.

Power of court, in absence of statute, to order psychiatric examination of accused for purpose of determining mental condition at time of alleged offense, 17 ALR4th 1274.

Admissibility of results of computer analysis of defendant's mental state, 37 ALR4th 510.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of psychiatrist or psychologist, 85 ALR4th 19.

Qualification of nonmedical psychologist to testify as to mental condition or competency, 72 ALR5th 529.